Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2017.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 28A.345.120 and 2021 c 197 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The Washington state school directors' association shall identify or develop and periodically update governance training programs that align with the cultural competency, diversity, equity, and inclusion standards for school director governance developed under RCW 28A.345.115. The governance training programs must also include building government-to-government relationships with federally recognized tribes, multicultural education, and principles of English language acquisition. Governance training programs may be developed in collaboration with other entities.(2) ((Beginning with the 2022 calendar year, the))The Washington state school directors' association shall provide a governance training program identified or developed under subsection (1) of this section at no cost to school directors, and at the frequency necessary for school directors to meet the requirement in RCW 28A.343.100.(3) Beginning with the 2025-26 school year, the Washington state school directors' association shall provide a virtual option for the governance training program identified or developed under subsection (1) of this section.(4) For purposes of this section, "cultural competency," "diversity," "equity," and "inclusion" have the same meaning as in RCW 28A.415.443.--- END ---